Utah statutes.
62A-11-503.    Requirement of employment and location information.
(1)  As of July 1, 1997, a court, before issuing or modifying an order of
support, shall require the parties to file the information required under
Section 62A-11-304.4.
(2)  If a party fails to provide the information required by Section
62A-11-304.4, the court shall issue or modify an order upon receipt of a
verified representation of employment or source of income for that party based
on the best evidence available if:
(a)  that party has participated in the current proceeding;
(b)  the notice and service of process requirements of the Utah Rules of Civil
Procedure have been met if the case is before the court to establish an
original order of support; or
(c)  the notice requirements of Section 62A-11-304.4 have been met if the case
is before the court to modify an existing order.
(3)  A court may restrict the disclosure of information required by Section
62A-11-304.4:
(a)  in accordance with a protective order involving the parties; or
(b)  if the court has reason to believe that the release of information may
result in physical or emotional harm by one party to the other party.
